Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1171
Violations; penalties; injunction.

Any person who violates any provision or requirements of the Livestock Auction Market Act is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day any person operates or conducts a livestock auction market in this state without a license as prescribed in such act is considered a separate offense. The director may institute proceedings to enjoin the operation of a livestock auction market if the person sought to be enjoined is operating a livestock auction market without a market license in good standing as provided in such act.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 15, p. 969;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 35;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 70;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 14.